Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB102.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 2709(C) OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (F) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:§ 2709. HARASSMENT.* * *(C) GRADING.--(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER [PARAGRAPH (3)] PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4), AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2) OR (3) SHALL CONSTITUTE A SUMMARY OFFENSE.(2) AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4), (5), (6) OR (7) <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 OR (A.1) SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE.(3) THE GRADING OF AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2) OR (3) SHALL BE ENHANCED ONE DEGREE IF THE PERSON HAS PREVIOUSLY VIOLATED AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER 23 PA.C.S. § 6108 (RELATING TO RELIEF) INVOLVING THE SAME VICTIM, FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER.(4) THE GRADING OF AN OFFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2) OR (3) SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE WHERE THE VICTIM IS A SPORTS OFFICIAL WHO WAS HARASSED AS A RESULT OF OFFICIAL ACTS OR STATUS AS A SPORTS OFFICIAL.* * *(F) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:* * *"SPORTS OFFICIAL." A PERSON AT A SPORTING EVENT WHO ENFORCES THE RULES OF THE EVENT, INCLUDING A PERSON WHO SUPERVISES THE PARTICIPANTS. THE TERM INCLUDES A COACH, UMPIRE, REFEREE, TRAINER, TEAM ATTENDANT, GAME MANAGER, ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, ASSISTANT ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, PRESIDENT, DEAN, HEADMASTER, PRINCIPAL AND ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL OF A SCHOOL, COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY.SECTION 2. TITLE 18 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 2709.2. Harassment of sports official.(a) Offense defined.--A person who violates section 2709(a)(1), (2), (3) or (4) (relating to harassment), where the victim is a sports official who was harassed as a result of official acts or status as a sports official, is guilty of harassment of a sports official.(b) Grading.--An offense under subsection (a) shall 20250HB0102PN1943 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Sports official." A person at a sporting event who enforces the rules of the event, such as an umpire or referee, or a person who supervises the participants, such as a coach. The term includes a trainer, team attendant, game manager, athletic director, assistant athletic director, president, dean, headmaster, principal and assistant principal of a school, college or university.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0102PN1943 - 3 - <--123456789101112